District of Columbia statutes.
46-309.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 901, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(i), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-349.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 901 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).